usarufa.lexc
LEXICON Verb
    talk:te     VSuffix;
	eat:naa     VSuffix;
	do:o        VSuffix;
	give:ame    VSuffix;
	hear:itaa   VSuffix;
	hit:ikamo   VSuffix;

LEXICON VSuffix	
	+1s:^une   #;
	+2s:^ne	   #;
	+3s:^iye   #;
	+2d:^koa   #;
